Arkansas, session 2025, SB229.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 45, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-45-107. Department of Financial Services — Creation.
(a) There is created within the Department of Commerce the Department
of Financial Services.
(b) The Department of Financial Services shall consist of:
(1) The State Bank Department; and
(2) State Securities Department.
(c) The Bank Commissioner shall be the Director of the Department of
Financial Services.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 25-43-302(a)(21), concerning the state
entities within the Department of Commerce, is amended to read as follows:
(21) The State Bank Department, created under § 23-46-201,
within the Department of Financial Services;

*ANS154*
02/13/2025 12:55:44 PM ANS154

SB229
SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 25-43-302(a), concerning the state entities
within the Department of Commerce, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(26) The Department of Financial Services, created under § 23-
45-107.































02/13/2025 12:55:44 PM ANS154